Massachusetts, session 194th, S2497.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 115, Section 5 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official edition is hereby amended by striking out the following words in line 108:- “,subject to
appropriation,”
of 1